Utah statutes.
26-6b-3.4.   Medical records -- Privacy protections.

(1) (a)  Health care providers as defined in Section 78B-3-403, health care facilities licensed under Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act, and governmental entities, shall, when requested, provide the public health official and the individual subject to an order of restriction, a copy of medical records that are relevant to the order of restriction.

(b)  The records requested under Subsection (1)(a) shall be provided as soon as reasonably possible after the request is submitted to the health care provider or health care facility, or as soon as reasonably possible after the health care provider or facility receives the results of any relevant diagnostic testing of the individual.

(2) (a)  The production of records under the provisions of this section is for the benefit of the public health and safety of the citizens of the state.  A health care provider or facility is encouraged to provide copies of medical records or other records necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter free of charge.

(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (2)(c), a health care facility that is a state governmental entity shall provide medical records or other records necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, free of charge.

(c)  If a health care provider or health care facility does not provide medical records free of charge under the provisions of Subsection (2)(a) or (b), the health care provider or facility may charge a fee for the records that does not exceed the presumed reasonable charges established for workers' compensation by administrative rule adopted by the Labor Commission.

(3)  Medical records held by a court related to orders of restriction under this chapter shall be sealed by the district court at the conclusion of the case.

